Utah statutes.
63G-6a-502.   Purpose of request for information.

(1)  The purpose of a request for information is to:

(a)  obtain information, comments, or suggestions from potential bidders or offerors before issuing an invitation for bids or request for proposals;

(b)  determine whether to issue an invitation for bids or a request for proposals; and

(c)  generate interest in a potential invitation for bids or a request for proposals.

(2)  A request for information may be useful in order to:

(a)  prepare to issue an invitation for bids or request for proposals for an unfamiliar or complex procurement;

(b)  determine the market availability of a procurement item; or

(c)  determine best practices, industry standards, performance standards, product specifications, and innovations relating to a procurement item.



Enacted by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session

